District of Columbia statutes.
47-335

Permissible security.

Any revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations authorized by an act of the Council of the District of Columbia enacted subsequent to August 1, 1981, pursuant to § 1-204.90(a), may be secured by a mortgage of real property or a security interest in any revenues, assets, or other property, notwithstanding that such mortgage or other security interest may not have been authorized by such § 1-204.90(a) as of the effective date of such act.

History

Dec. 23, 1981, 95 Stat. 1493, Pub. L. 97-105, § 19(b)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-335.